Texas statutes.
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE CODE

TITLE 4. REGULATORY AND PENAL PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 106. PROVISIONS RELATING TO AGE

Sec. 106.01. DEFINITION. In this code, "minor" means a person under 21 years of age.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 513, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977. Amended by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 257, ch. 107, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1981; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 285, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1986; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 462, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1986.

Sec. 106.02. PURCHASE OF ALCOHOL BY A MINOR. (a) A minor commits an offense if the minor purchases an alcoholic beverage. A minor does not commit an offense if the minor purchases an alcoholic beverage under the immediate supervision of a commissioned peace officer engaged in enforcing the provisions of this code.

(b) An offense under this section is punishable as provided by Section 106.071.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 513, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 163, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 934, Sec. 75, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1013, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1139, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1997.

Sec. 106.025. ATTEMPT TO PURCHASE ALCOHOL BY A MINOR. (a) A minor commits an offense if, with specific intent to commit an offense under Section 106.02 of this code, the minor does an act amounting to more than mere preparation that tends but fails to effect the commission of the offense intended.

(b) An offense under this section is punishable as provided by Section 106.071.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 934, Sec. 76, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1013, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 106.03. SALE TO MINORS. (a) A person commits an offense if with criminal negligence he sells an alcoholic beverage to a minor.

(b) A person who sells a minor an alcoholic beverage does not commit an offense if the minor falsely represents himself to be 21 years old or older by displaying an apparently valid proof of identification that contains a physical description and photograph consistent with the minor's appearance, purports to establish that the minor is 21 years of age or older, and was issued by a governmental agency. The proof of identification may include a driver's license or identification card issued by the Department of Public Safety, a passport, or a military identification card.

(c) An offense under this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

(d) Subsection (b) does not apply to a person who accesses electronically readable information under Section 109.61 that identifies a driver's license or identification certificate as invalid.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 513, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977. Amended by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 257, ch. 107, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1981; Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 2649, ch. 456, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1983; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 285, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1986; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 462, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1986; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 582, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1988; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1013, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 391 (S.B. 1465), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 488 (S.B. 693), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 106.04. CONSUMPTION OF ALCOHOL BY A MINOR. (a) A minor commits an offense if he consumes an alcoholic beverage.

(b) It is an affirmative defense to prosecution under this section that the alcoholic beverage was consumed in the visible presence of the minor's adult parent, guardian, or spouse.

(c) An offense under this section is punishable as provided by Section 106.071.

(d) A minor who commits an offense under this section and who has been previously convicted twice or more of offenses under this section is not eligible for deferred disposition. For the purposes of this subsection:

(1) an adjudication under Title 3, Family Code, that the minor engaged in conduct described by this section is considered a conviction of an offense under this section; and

(2) an order of deferred disposition for an offense alleged under this section is considered a conviction of an offense under this section.

(e) Subsection (a) does not apply to a minor who:

(1) requested emergency medical assistance in response to the possible alcohol overdose of the minor or another person;

(2) was the first person to make a request for medical assistance under Subdivision (1); and

(3) if the minor requested emergency medical assistance for the possible alcohol overdose of another person:

(A) remained on the scene until the medical assistance arrived; and

(B) cooperated with medical assistance and law enforcement personnel.

(f) Except as provided by Subsection (g), Subsection (a) does not apply to a minor who reports the sexual assault of the minor or another person, or is the victim of a sexual assault reported by another person, to:

(1) a health care provider treating the victim of the sexual assault;

(2) an employee of a law enforcement agency, including an employee of a campus police department of an institution of higher education; or

(3) the Title IX coordinator of an institution of higher education or another employee of the institution responsible for responding to reports of sexual assault.

(g) A minor is entitled to raise the defense provided by Subsection (f) in the prosecution of an offense under this section only if the minor is in violation of this section at the time of the commission of a sexual assault that is:

(1) reported by the minor under Subsection (f); or

(2) committed against the minor and reported by another person under Subsection (f).

(h) A minor who commits a sexual assault that is reported under Subsection (f) is not entitled to raise the defense provided by Subsection (f) in the prosecution of the minor for an offense under this section.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 514, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 163, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 934, Sec. 77, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1013, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1207, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 842 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1243 (S.B. 1331), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 204 (S.B. 966), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 106.041. DRIVING OR OPERATING WATERCRAFT UNDER THE INFLUENCE OF ALCOHOL BY MINOR. (a) A minor commits an offense if the minor operates a motor vehicle in a public place, or a watercraft, while having any detectable amount of alcohol in the minor's system.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c), an offense under this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

(c) If it is shown at the trial of the defendant that the defendant is a minor who is not a child and who has been previously convicted at least twice of an offense under this section, the offense is punishable by:

(1) a fine of not less than $500 or more than $2,000;

(2) confinement in jail for a term not to exceed 180 days; or

(3) both the fine and confinement.

(d) In addition to any fine and any order issued under Section 106.115, the court shall order a minor convicted of an offense under this section to perform community service for:

(1) not less than 20 or more than 40 hours, if the minor has not been previously convicted of an offense under this section; or

(2) not less than 40 or more than 60 hours, if the minor has been previously convicted of an offense under this section.

(e) Community service ordered under this section must be related to education about or prevention of misuse of alcohol.

(f) A minor who commits an offense under this section and who has been previously convicted twice or more of offenses under this section is not eligible for deferred disposition or deferred adjudication.

(g) An offense under this section is not a lesser included offense under Section 49.04, 49.045, 49.06, or 49.061, Penal Code.

(h) For the purpose of determining whether a minor has been previously convicted of an offense under this section:

(1) an adjudication under Title 3, Family Code, that the minor engaged in conduct described by this section is considered a conviction under this section; and

(2) an order of deferred disposition for an offense alleged under this section is considered a conviction of an offense under this section.

(i) A peace officer who is charging a minor with committing an offense under this section is not required to take the minor into custody but may issue a citation to the minor that contains written notice of the time and place the minor must appear before a magistrate, the name and address of the minor charged, and the offense charged.

(j) In this section:

(1) "Child" has the meaning assigned by Section 51.02, Family Code.

(2) "Motor vehicle" has the meaning assigned by Section 32.34(a), Penal Code.

(3) "Public place" has the meaning assigned by Section 1.07, Penal Code.

(4) "Watercraft" has the meaning assigned by Section 49.01, Penal Code.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1013, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1207, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 949 (H.B. 1575), Sec. 29, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1348 (S.B. 328), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1348 (S.B. 328), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1348 (S.B. 328), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 813 (H.B. 1163), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 106.05. POSSESSION OF ALCOHOL BY A MINOR. (a) Except as provided in Subsection (b) of this section, a minor commits an offense if he possesses an alcoholic beverage.

(b) A minor may possess an alcoholic beverage:

(1) while in the course and scope of the minor's employment if the minor is an employee of a licensee or permittee and the employment is not prohibited by this code;

(2) if the minor is in the visible presence of his adult parent, guardian, or spouse, or other adult to whom the minor has been committed by a court;

(3) if the minor is under the immediate supervision of a commissioned peace officer engaged in enforcing the provisions of this code; or

(4) if the beverage is lawfully provided to the minor under Section 106.16.

(c) An offense under this section is punishable as provided by Section 106.071.

(d) Subsection (a) does not apply to a minor who:

(1) requested emergency medical assistance in response to the possible alcohol overdose of the minor or another person;

(2) was the first person to make a request for medical assistance under Subdivision (1); and

(3) if the minor requested emergency medical assistance for the possible alcohol overdose of another person:

(A) remained on the scene until the medical assistance arrived; and

(B) cooperated with medical assistance and law enforcement personnel.

(e) Except as provided by Subsection (f), Subsection (a) does not apply to a minor who reports the sexual assault of the minor or another person, or is the victim of a sexual assault reported by another person, to:

(1) a health care provider treating the victim of the sexual assault;

(2) an employee of a law enforcement agency, including an employee of a campus police department of an institution of higher education; or

(3) the Title IX coordinator of an institution of higher education or another employee of the institution responsible for responding to reports of sexual assault.

(f) A minor is entitled to raise the defense provided by Subsection (e) in the prosecution of an offense under this section only if the minor is in violation of this section at the time of the commission of a sexual assault that is:

(1) reported by the minor under Subsection (e); or

(2) committed against the minor and reported by another person under Subsection (e).

(g) A minor who commits a sexual assault that is reported under Subsection (e) is not entitled to raise the defense provided by Subsection (e) in the prosecution of the minor for an offense under this section.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 514, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977. Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 1973, ch. 777, Sec. 21, eff. Aug. 27, 1979; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 163, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 934, Sec. 78, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1013, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1139, Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 842 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1243 (S.B. 1331), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 514 (H.B. 909), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 204 (S.B. 966), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 106.06. PURCHASE OF ALCOHOL FOR A MINOR; FURNISHING ALCOHOL TO A MINOR. (a) Except as provided in Subsection (b), a person commits an offense if the person purchases an alcoholic beverage for or gives an alcoholic beverage to a minor.

(b) A person may purchase an alcoholic beverage for or give an alcoholic beverage to a minor if the person is:

(1) the minor's adult parent, guardian, or spouse, or an adult in whose custody the minor has been committed by a court, and is visibly present when the minor possesses or consumes the alcoholic beverage; or

(2) a person lawfully providing an alcoholic beverage to a minor under Section 106.16.

(c) Except as provided by Subsection (c-1), an offense under this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

(c-1) An offense under this section is a state jail felony if it is shown on the trial of the offense that the person purchased an alcoholic beverage for or gave an alcoholic beverage to a minor who, as a result of the consumption of the alcoholic beverage, caused another person to suffer serious bodily injury or death.

(d) A judge, acting under Chapter 42A, Code of Criminal Procedure, who places a defendant charged with an offense under this section on community supervision under that chapter shall, if the defendant committed the offense at a gathering where participants were involved in the abuse of alcohol, including binge drinking or forcing or coercing individuals to consume alcohol, in addition to any other condition imposed by the judge:

(1) require the defendant to:

(A) perform community service for not less than 20 or more than 40 hours; and

(B) attend an alcohol awareness program approved under Section 106.115; and

(2) order the Department of Public Safety to suspend the driver's license or permit of the defendant or, if the defendant does not have a driver's license or permit, to deny the issuance of a driver's license or permit to the defendant for 180 days.

(e) Community service ordered under Subsection (d) is in addition to any community service ordered by the judge under Article 42A.304, Code of Criminal Procedure, and must be related to education about or prevention of misuse of alcohol if programs or services providing that education are available in the community in which the court is located. If programs or services providing that education are not available, the court may order community service that the court considers appropriate for rehabilitative purposes.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 514, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 437, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 934, Sec. 79, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1013, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1097, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 842 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1243 (S.B. 1331), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 514 (H.B. 909), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 770 (H.B. 2299), Sec. 2.01, eff. January 1, 2017.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 663 (H.B. 420), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 663 (H.B. 420), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 106.07. MISREPRESENTATION OF AGE BY A MINOR. (a) A minor commits an offense if he falsely states that he is 21 years of age or older or presents any document that indicates he is 21 years of age or older to a person engaged in selling or serving alcoholic beverages.

(b) An offense under this section is punishable as provided by Section 106.071.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 514, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977. Amended by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 257, ch. 107, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1981; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 285, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1986; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 462, Sec. 11, eff. Sept. 1, 1986; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1013, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 106.071. PUNISHMENT FOR ALCOHOL-RELATED OFFENSE BY MINOR. (a) This section applies to an offense under Section 106.02, 106.025, 106.04, 106.05, or 106.07.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c), an offense to which this section applies is a Class C misdemeanor.

(c) If it is shown at the trial of the defendant that the defendant is a minor who is not a child and who has been previously convicted at least twice of an offense to which this section applies, the offense is punishable by:

(1) a fine of not less than $250 or more than $2,000;

(2) confinement in jail for a term not to exceed 180 days; or

(3) both the fine and confinement.

(d) In addition to any fine and any order issued under Section 106.115:

(1) the court shall order a minor placed on deferred disposition for or convicted of an offense to which this section applies to perform community service for:

(A) not less than eight or more than 12 hours, if the minor has not been previously convicted of an offense to which this section applies; or

(B) not less than 20 or more than 40 hours, if the minor has been previously convicted once of an offense to which this section applies; and

(2) the court shall order the Department of Public Safety to suspend the driver's license or permit of a minor convicted of an offense to which this section applies or, if the minor does not have a driver's license or permit, to deny the issuance of a driver's license or permit for:

(A) 30 days, if the minor has not been previously convicted of an offense to which this section applies;

(B) 60 days, if the minor has been previously convicted once of an offense to which this section applies; or

(C) 180 days, if the minor has been previously convicted twice or more of an offense to which this section applies.

(e) Community service ordered under this section must be related to education about or prevention of misuse of alcohol or drugs, as applicable, if programs or services providing that education are available in the community in which the court is located. If programs or services providing that education are not available, the court may order community service that it considers appropriate for rehabilitative purposes.

(f) In this section:

(1) a prior adjudication under Title 3, Family Code, that the minor engaged in conduct described by this section is considered a conviction; and

(2) a prior order of deferred disposition for an offense alleged under this section is considered a conviction.

(g) In this section, "child" has the meaning assigned by Section 51.02, Family Code.

(h) A driver's license suspension under this section takes effect on the 11th day after the date the minor is convicted.

(i) A defendant who is not a child and who has been previously convicted at least twice of an offense to which this section applies is not eligible to receive a deferred disposition or deferred adjudication.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1013, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1207, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 949 (H.B. 1575), Sec. 30, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1004 (H.B. 642), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 106.08. IMPORTATION BY A MINOR. No minor may import into this state or possess with intent to import into this state any alcoholic beverage.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 515, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Sec. 106.09. EMPLOYMENT OF MINORS. (a) Except as provided by Subsections (b), (c), (e), and (f), no person may employ a person under 18 years of age to sell, prepare, serve, or otherwise handle liquor, or to assist in doing so.

(b) A holder of a wine only package store permit may employ a person 16 years old or older to work in any capacity.

(c) A holder of a permit or license providing for the on-premises consumption of alcoholic beverages may employ a person under 18 years of age to work in any capacity other than the actual selling, preparing, or serving of alcoholic beverages.

(d) A person who is 18, 19, or 20 years of age is not prohibited from acting as an agent under Chapter 35, 36, or 73, provided the person may carry out the activities authorized by those chapters only while in the actual course and scope of the person's employment.

(e) The holder of a permit or license providing for the on-premises consumption of alcoholic beverages who also holds a food and beverage certificate may employ a person under 18 years of age to work as a cashier for transactions involving the sale of alcoholic beverages if the alcoholic beverages are served by a person 18 years of age or older.

(f) The holder of a permit or license providing for the on-premises consumption of alcoholic beverages that derives less than 50 percent of its gross receipts for the premises from the sale or service of alcoholic beverages may employ a person under 18 years of age to work as a cashier for transactions involving the sale of alcoholic beverages if the alcoholic beverages are served by a person 18 years of age or older.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 515, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977. Amended by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 258, ch. 107, Sec. 11, 12, eff. Sept. 1, 1981; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 754, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 499, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1190 (S.B. 1090), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 46 (S.B. 1651), Sec. 1, eff. May 19, 2015.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 329, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 106.10. PLEA OF GUILTY BY MINOR. No minor may plead guilty to an offense under this chapter except in open court before a judge.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 515, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Sec. 106.115. ALCOHOL AWARENESS PROGRAM; LICENSE SUSPENSION.

(a) On the placement of a minor on deferred disposition for an offense under Section 49.02, Penal Code, or under Section 106.02, 106.025, 106.04, 106.041, 106.05, or 106.07, the court shall require the defendant to successfully complete one of the following programs:

(1) an alcohol awareness program under this section that is regulated under Chapter 171, Government Code; or

(2) a substance misuse education program under Section 521.374(a)(1), Transportation Code, that is regulated under Chapter 171, Government Code.

(a-1) On conviction of a minor of an offense under Section 49.02, Penal Code, or Section 106.02, 106.025, 106.04, 106.041, 106.05, or 106.07, the court, in addition to assessing a fine as provided by those sections, shall require a defendant who has not been previously convicted of an offense under one of those sections to successfully complete an alcohol awareness program or a substance misuse education program. If the defendant has been previously convicted once or more of an offense under one or more of those sections, the court may require the defendant to successfully complete an alcohol awareness program or a substance misuse education program.

(a-2) If the defendant is younger than 18 years of age, the court may require the parent or guardian of the defendant to attend the program described by Subsection (a) with the defendant.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 948 (S.B. 1480), Sec. 19(1), eff. September 1, 2021.

(b-1) If the defendant resides in a county with a population of 75,000 or less and access to an alcohol awareness program is not readily available in the county, the court may allow the defendant to take an online alcohol awareness program approved by the Texas Department of Licensing and Regulation or require the defendant to perform not less than eight hours of community service related to alcohol abuse prevention or treatment instead of attending the alcohol awareness program. Community service ordered under this subsection is in addition to community service ordered under Section 106.071(d).

(b-2) For purposes of Subsection (b-1), if the defendant is enrolled in an institution of higher education located in a county in which access to an alcohol awareness program is readily available, the court may consider the defendant to be a resident of that county. If the defendant is not enrolled in such an institution of higher education or if the court does not consider the defendant to be a resident of the county in which the institution is located, the defendant's residence is the residence listed on the defendant's driver's license or personal identification certificate issued by the Department of Public Safety. If the defendant does not have a driver's license or personal identification certificate issued by the Department of Public Safety, the defendant's residence is the residence on the defendant's voter registration certificate. If the defendant is not registered to vote, the defendant's residence is the residence on file with the public school district on which the defendant's enrollment is based. If the defendant is not enrolled in public school, the defendant's residence is determined by the court.

(b-3) Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 627 (H.B. 4417), Sec. 3(1), eff. June 11, 2023.

(c) The court shall require the defendant to present to the court, within 90 days of the date of final conviction, evidence in the form prescribed by the court that the defendant, as ordered by the court, has satisfactorily completed an alcohol awareness program or performed the required hours of community service. For good cause the court may extend this period by not more than 90 days. If the defendant presents the required evidence within the prescribed period, the court may reduce the assessed fine to an amount equal to no less than one-half of the amount of the initial fine.

(d) If the defendant does not present the required evidence within the prescribed period, the court:

(1) shall order the Department of Public Safety to:

(A) suspend the defendant's driver's license or permit for a period not to exceed six months or, if the defendant does not have a license or permit, to deny the issuance of a license or permit to the defendant for that period; or

(B) if the defendant has been previously convicted of an offense under one or more of the sections listed in Subsection (a), suspend the defendant's driver's license or permit for a period not to exceed one year or, if the defendant does not have a license or permit, to deny the issuance of a license or permit to the defendant for that period; and

(2) may order the defendant or the parent, managing conservator, or guardian of the defendant to do any act or refrain from doing any act if the court determines that doing the act or refraining from doing the act will increase the likelihood that the defendant will present evidence to the court that the defendant has satisfactorily completed an alcohol awareness program or performed the required hours of community service.

(e) The Department of Public Safety shall send notice of the suspension or prohibition order issued under Subsection (d) by first class mail to the defendant. The notice must include the date of the suspension or prohibition order, the reason for the suspension or prohibition, and the period covered by the suspension or prohibition.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 163, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 934, Sec. 80, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 615, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 577, Sec. 17, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1013, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 2.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1207, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1409, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1056 (H.B. 1357), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 656 (H.B. 1020), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 848 (H.B. 232), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.223, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1004 (H.B. 642), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 663 (H.B. 1560), Sec. 5.57, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 948 (S.B. 1480), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 948 (S.B. 1480), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 948 (S.B. 1480), Sec. 19(1), eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 627 (H.B. 4417), Sec. 1, eff. June 11, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 627 (H.B. 4417), Sec. 2, eff. June 11, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 627 (H.B. 4417), Sec. 3(1), eff. June 11, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1021 (H.B. 5183), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1021 (H.B. 5183), Sec. 2, eff. June 18, 2023.

Sec. 106.116. REPORTS OF COURT TO COMMISSION. Unless the clerk is otherwise required to include the information in a report submitted under Section 101.09, the clerk of a court, including a justice court, municipal court, or juvenile court, shall furnish to the commission on request a notice of a conviction of an offense under this chapter or an adjudication under Title 3, Family Code, for conduct that constitutes an offense under this chapter. The report must be in the form prescribed by the commission.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1013, Sec. 11, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 106.117. REPORT OF COURT TO DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY. (a) Each court, including a justice court, municipal court, or juvenile court, shall furnish to the Department of Public Safety a notice of each:

(1) adjudication under Title 3, Family Code, for conduct that constitutes an offense under this chapter;

(2) conviction of an offense under this chapter;

(3) order of deferred disposition for an offense alleged under this chapter; and

(4) acquittal of an offense under Section 106.041.

(b) The notice must be in a form prescribed by the Department of Public Safety and must contain the driver's license number of the defendant, if the defendant holds a driver's license.

(c) The Department of Public Safety shall maintain appropriate records of information in the notices and shall provide the information to law enforcement agencies and courts as necessary to enable those agencies and courts to carry out their official duties. The information is admissible in any action in which it is relevant. A person who holds a driver's license having the same number that is contained in a record maintained under this section is presumed to be the person to whom the record relates. The presumption may be rebutted only by evidence presented under oath.

(d) The information maintained under this section is confidential and may not be disclosed except as provided by this section. A provision of Chapter 58, Family Code, or other law limiting collection or reporting of information on a juvenile or other minor or requiring destruction of that information does not apply to information reported and maintained under this section.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1013, Sec. 11, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1207, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 106.12. EXPUNCTION OF CONVICTION OR ARREST RECORDS OF A MINOR. (a) Any person convicted of not more than one violation of this code while a minor, on attaining the age of 21 years, may apply to the court in which he was convicted to have the conviction expunged.

(b) The application shall contain the applicant's sworn statement that he was not convicted of any violation of this code while a minor other than the one he seeks to have expunged.

(c) If the court finds that the applicant was not convicted of any other violation of this code while he was a minor, the court shall order the conviction, together with all complaints, verdicts, sentences, prosecutorial and law enforcement records, and other documents relating to the offense, to be expunged from the applicant's record. After entry of the order, the applicant shall be released from all disabilities resulting from the conviction, and the conviction may not be shown or made known for any purpose.

(d) Any person placed under a custodial or noncustodial arrest for not more than one incident in violation of this code while a minor and who was not convicted of the violation may apply to the court in which the person was charged to have the records of the arrest expunged. The application must contain the applicant's sworn statement that the applicant was not arrested for an event leading to a violation of this code other than the arrest the applicant seeks to expunge. If the court finds the applicant was not arrested for any other event leading to a violation of this code while a minor, the court shall order all complaints, verdicts, prosecutorial and law enforcement records, and other documents relating to the violation to be expunged from the applicant's record. If the event leading to a violation of this code included multiple violations during this event all violations of this code are eligible for expungement.

(e) The court shall charge an applicant a fee in the amount of $30 for each application for expunction filed under this section to defray the cost of notifying state agencies of orders of expunction under this section.

Text of subsection effective until January 01, 2025

(f) The procedures for expunction provided under this section are separate and distinct from the expunction procedures under Chapter 55, Code of Criminal Procedure.

Text of subsection effective on January 01, 2025

(f) The procedures for expunction provided under this section are separate and distinct from the expunction procedures under Chapter 55A, Code of Criminal Procedure.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 515, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977. Amended by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 258, ch. 107, Sec. 13, eff. Sept. 1, 1981; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 285, Sec. 11, eff. Sept. 1, 1986; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 462, Sec. 12, eff. Sept. 1, 1986.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 886 (S.B. 1426), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 464 (H.B. 2059), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 464 (H.B. 2059), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 346), Sec. 2.01, eff. January 1, 2020.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 2.003, eff. January 1, 2025.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 949 (S.B. 1725), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 106.13. SANCTIONS AGAINST RETAILER. (a) Except as provided in Subsections (b) and (c) of this section, the commission or administrator may cancel or suspend for not more than 90 days a retail license or permit or a private club registration permit if it is found, on notice and hearing, that the licensee or permittee with criminal negligence sold, served, dispensed, or delivered an alcoholic beverage to a minor or with criminal negligence permitted a minor to violate Section 106.04 or 106.05 of this code on the licensed premises.

(b) For a second offense the commission or administrator may cancel the license or permit or suspend it for not more than six months. For a third offense within a period of 36 consecutive months the commission or administrator may cancel the permit or suspend it for not more than 12 months.

(c) The commission or administrator may relax the provisions of this section concerning suspension and cancellation and assess a sanction the commission or administrator finds just under the circumstances if, at a hearing, the licensee or permittee establishes to the satisfaction of the commission or administrator:

(1) that the violation could not reasonably have been prevented by the permittee or licensee by the exercise of due diligence;

(2) that the permittee or licensee was entrapped; or

(3) that an agent, servant, or employee of the permittee or licensee violated this code without the knowledge of the permittee or licensee.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 516, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 437, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 934, Sec. 81, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 798, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1097, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 106.14. ACTIONS OF EMPLOYEE. (a) For purposes of this chapter and any other provision of this code relating to the sales, service, dispensing, or delivery of alcoholic beverages to a person who is not a member of a private club on the club premises, a minor, or an intoxicated person or the consumption of alcoholic beverages by a person who is not a member of a private club on the club premises, a minor, or an intoxicated person, the actions of an employee shall not be attributable to the employer if:

(1) the employer requires its employees to attend a commission-approved seller training program;

(2) the employee has actually attended such a training program; and

(3) the employer has not directly or indirectly encouraged the employee to violate such law.

(b) The commission shall adopt rules or policies establishing the minimum requirements for approved seller training programs. Upon application, the commission shall approve seller training programs meeting such requirements that are sponsored either privately, by public community colleges, or by public or private institutions of higher education that offer a four-year undergraduate program and a degree or certificate in hotel or motel management, restaurant management, or travel or tourism management. The commission may charge an application fee to be set by the commission in such amount as is necessary to defray the expense of processing the application.

(c) The commission may approve under this section a seller training program sponsored by a licensee or permittee for the purpose of training its employees whether or not such employees are located at the same premises. This subsection shall only apply to licensees or permittees who employ at least 150 persons at any one time during the license or permit year who sell, serve, or prepare alcoholic beverages.

(d) The commission may approve under this section a seller training program conducted by a hotel management company or a hotel operating company for the employees of five or more hotels operated or managed by the company if:

(1) the seller training program is administered through the corporate offices of the company; and

(2) the hotels employ a total of at least 200 persons at one time during the license or permit year who sell, serve, or prepare alcoholic beverages.

(e) After notice and hearing, the commission may cancel or suspend the commission's approval of a seller training program, the commission's certification of a trainer to teach a seller training program, or the commission's certification of a seller-server if the program, trainer, or seller-server violates this code or a commission rule. The commission may give a program, trainer, or seller-server the opportunity to pay a civil penalty rather than be subject to suspension under this subsection. Sections 11.62 through 11.67 apply to the program approval or certification as if the program approval or certification were a license or permit under this code.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 582, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 477, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 934, Sec. 82, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 270, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 643, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 158 (H.B. 1952), Sec. 1, eff. May 28, 2011.

Sec. 106.15. PROHIBITED ACTIVITIES BY PERSONS YOUNGER THAN 18. (a) A permittee or licensee commits an offense if he employs, authorizes, permits, or induces a person younger than 18 years of age to dance with another person in exchange for a benefit, as defined by Section 1.07, Penal Code, on the premises covered by the permit or license.

(b) An offense under Subsection (a) is a Class A misdemeanor.

(c) In addition to a penalty imposed under Subsection (b), the commission or administrator shall:

(1) suspend for a period of five days the license or permit of a person convicted of a first offense under Subsection (a);

(2) suspend for a period of 60 days the license or permit of a person convicted of a second offense under Subsection (a); and

(3) cancel the license or permit of a person convicted of a third offense under Subsection (a).

(d) This section does not apply to a gift or benefit given for a dance at a wedding, anniversary, or similar event.

(e) A person does not commit an offense under Subsection (a) if the person younger than 18 years of age falsely represents the person's age to be at least 18 years of age by displaying an apparently valid Texas driver's license or an identification card issued by the Department of Public Safety containing a physical description consistent with the person's appearance.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 80, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 106.16. EXCEPTION FOR CERTAIN COURSE WORK. (a) In this section:

(1) "Career school or college" has the meaning assigned by Section 132.001, Education Code.

(2) "Taste" means to draw a beverage into the mouth without swallowing or otherwise consuming the beverage.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a minor may taste an alcoholic beverage if:

(1) the minor:

(A) is at least 18 years old; and

(B) is enrolled:

(i) as a student at a public or private institution of higher education or a career school or college that offers a program in culinary arts, viticulture, enology or wine technology, brewing or malt beverage technology, or distilled spirits production or technology; and

(ii) in a course that is part of a program described by Subparagraph (i);

(2) the beverage is tasted for educational purposes as part of the curriculum for the course described by Subdivision (1)(B)(ii);

(3) the beverage is not purchased by the minor; and

(4) the service and tasting of the beverage is supervised by a faculty or staff member who is at least 21 years of age.

(c) A public or private institution of higher education or a career school or college is not required to hold a license or permit to engage in the activities authorized under this section.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 514 (H.B. 909), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 330, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 106.17. PRESENCE OR EMPLOYMENT OF CERTAIN PERSONS AT PERMITTED OR LICENSED PREMISES OPERATING AS SEXUALLY ORIENTED BUSINESS. (a) An individual younger than 18 years of age may not be on premises covered by a permit or license issued under this code if a sexually oriented business, as defined by Section 243.002, Local Government Code, operates on the premises.

(b) The holder of a permit or license covering a premises described by Subsection (a) may not:

(1) knowingly or recklessly allow an individual younger than 18 years of age to be on the premises; or

(2) enter into a contract, other than a contract described by Section 51.016(g), Labor Code, with an individual younger than 21 years of age for the performance of work or the provision of a service on the premises.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, if it is found, after notice and hearing, that a permittee or licensee has violated Subsection (b) the commission or administrator shall:

(1) suspend the permit or license for 30 days for the first violation;

(2) suspend the permit or license for 60 days for the second violation; and

(3) cancel the permit or license for the third violation.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 942 (S.B. 766), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.